Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1226
Act, how cited.

Sections 43-1226 to 43-1266 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 1.